Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1107.01
Expanded function dental assistant, defined.

Expanded function dental assistant means a licensed dental assistant who has met the requirements to practice as an expanded function dental assistant pursuant to section 38-1118.03.

Laws 2017, LB18, § 6.